Louisiana, session 2026, HB767.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:268 and 3002(A)(7) and (B)(9) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§268. Recreational alligator harvest lottery
A. The commission shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations to
establish a lottery for the selection and issuance of alligator harvest tags. There shall
be a fifty-dollar nonrefundable entry fee for alligator harvest tag lottery applications.
Alligator harvest tags may be issued to successful and eligible lottery applicants at
no cost.
B. All revenues derived from lottery applications and auction proceeds shall
be deposited into the Conservation Fund.
* * *
§3002. Recreational hunting licenses; fees
A. Resident licenses:
* * *
(7) Alligator license $25.00/year
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 767 ENROLLED
B. Nonresident licenses:
* * *
(9) Alligator license $150.00
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the Act
which originated as Senate Bill No. 244 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
enacted and becomes effective.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.